Massachusetts, session 194th, H4292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The charter of the town of Hopkinton, which is on file in the office of the
archivist of the Commonwealth as provided in section 12 of chapter 43B of the General Laws, is
hereby amended by deleting paragraph (c) (“Library Director”) in its entirety and replacing it as
follows:
(c) Appointments — The Board of Library Trustees may appoint a Library Director, in
accordance with the Personnel Policies of the Town. The Board of Library Trustees shall
annually set goals for the Library Director with input from the Town Manager.
of 1